Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

General Improvement Bonds

7-33-201. General improvement bonds to pay costs chargeable to city.

For the purpose of raising funds with which to pay that portion of the cost of improvements chargeable against the municipalities authorized in this chapter, the municipality shall have the power and authority to issue its bonds pursuant to the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21 in an amount not exceeding one third (1/3) of the cost of any such improvement or improvements.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 21; Shan., § 1991a69; Code 1932, § 3476; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-1224; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 16.

Cross-References. Assessments and bonds unaffected by irregularities, §7-33-118.

Assessments pledged for payment of bonds, §7-33-119.

Bonds for improvements based on assessed values of benefited properties, title 7, ch. 33, part 3.

Bonds for special assessments, title 7, ch. 32, part 1.

Legislative provisions to assure funds for payment, §7-33-116.

Limitation of actions on bonds, §28-3-113.

7-33-202 — 7-33-211. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§7-33-202 —7-33-211 (Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 18, § 21; 1921 Private, ch. 526, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 3477-3489; Shan., §§ 1991a70-1991a82; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-1225 — 6-1234), concerning general improvement bonds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 17.